Idaho, session 2026, H0680.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-1618, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-1618. INVESTIGATIVE INTERVIEWS OF ALLEGED CHILD ABUSE VICTIMS. Un-
less otherwise demonstrated by good cause, all investigative or risk
assessment interviews of alleged victims of child abuse will, including
but not limited to safety assessments, investigative interviews, and risk
assessment interviews, shall be documented by audio or video taping whether
conducted by personnel of law enforcement entities, the department of health
and welfare or child advocacy centers. The absence of such audio or video
taping shall not limit the admissibility of such evidence in any related
court proceeding.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.